Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE G. MOTORCYCLES AND ELECTRIC BICYCLES

CHAPTER 680. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. SALE OF MOTORCYCLE WITHOUT SERIAL NUMBERS

Sec. 680.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.

(2) "Motorcycle" has the meaning assigned that term by Section 661.001.

(3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other private entity.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 680.002. SALE OF MOTORCYCLE WITHOUT SERIAL NUMBERS. A person may not sell a motorcycle manufactured after January 1, 1976, unless:

(1) the serial number of the frame and the serial number of the engine are affixed so that they may not be removed without defacing the frame or engine; and

(2) the manufacturer has filed with the department a statement that:

(A) identifies the part to which each number is affixed;

(B) gives the exact dimensions of the part; and

(C) gives the location on the part to which the number is affixed.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 680.003. OFFENSE; PENALTY. (a) An individual who violates Section 680.002 commits an offense.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by:

(1) a fine not to exceed $200;

(2) confinement in county jail for a term not to exceed 30 days; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

(c) Each sale of a motorcycle in violation of this subchapter is a separate offense.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 680.004. CIVIL PENALTY. A partnership, firm, corporation, or association that violates Section 680.002 is liable to the state for a civil penalty of not more than $500 for each offense.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 680.005. DIRECTOR TO ADOPT RULES AND DEVELOP FORMS. The director of the department shall adopt rules and develop forms to administer this subchapter.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. TOLLS FOR MOTORCYCLE; USE OF PREFERENTIAL LANE BY MOTORCYCLE

Sec. 680.011. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Motorcycle" has the meaning assigned by Section 502.001 and includes a motorcycle equipped with a sidecar.

(2) "Preferential lane" means a traffic lane on a street or highway where motor vehicle usage is limited to:

(A) buses;

(B) vehicles occupied by a minimum number of persons; or

(C) car pool vehicles.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 680.012. TOLL FOR MOTORCYCLE. A person who operates a toll road, toll bridge, or turnpike may not impose a toll for the operation of a motorcycle on the road, bridge, or turnpike that is greater than the toll imposed for the operation of a passenger car on the road, bridge, or turnpike.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 680.013. USE OF PREFERENTIAL LANE BY MOTORCYCLE. A motorcycle, including a motorcycle described by Section 521.001(a)(6-a), may be operated in a preferential lane that is not closed to all vehicular traffic.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 722 (S.B. 129), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 3599), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1391 (S.B. 1967), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.